Utah statutes.
26-21-207.   Covered providers required to apply for clearance for certain individuals other than residents residing in residential settings -- Certain individuals other than residents prohibited from residing in residential settings without clearance.

(1)  A covered provider that provides services in a residential setting shall:

(a)  collect the personal identification information specified by the department under Subsection 26-21-204(4)(b) for each individual 12 years of age or older, other than a resident, who resides in the residential setting; and

(b)  submit to the department an application for clearance for the individual, including:

(i)  the personal identification information; and

(ii)  any fees established by the department under Subsection 26-21-204(9).

(2)  A covered provider that provides services in a residential setting may allow an individual 12 years of age or older, other than a resident, to reside in the residential setting only if the individual has clearance.



Enacted by Chapter 328, 2012 General Session

